Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE I. HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES

Text of chapter effective until April 1, 2025

CHAPTER 539. COMMUNITY COLLABORATIVES

Text of section effective until April 01, 2025

Sec. 539.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "department" means the Department of State Health Services.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1143 (S.B. 58), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 2.277, eff. April 2, 2015.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 3.01(3), eff. April 1, 2025.

Without reference to the amendment of this section, this chapter was repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 3.01(3), eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 539.002. GRANTS FOR ESTABLISHMENT AND EXPANSION OF COMMUNITY COLLABORATIVES. (a) To the extent funds are appropriated to the department for that purpose, the department shall make grants to entities, including local governmental entities, nonprofit community organizations, and faith-based community organizations, to establish or expand community collaboratives that bring the public and private sectors together to provide services to persons experiencing homelessness, substance abuse issues, or mental illness. In awarding grants, the department shall give special consideration to entities:

(1) establishing new collaboratives;

(2) establishing or expanding collaboratives that serve two or more counties, each with a population of less than 100,000; or

(3) providing services to an average of at least 50 percent of persons experiencing homelessness in a geographic area served by a Continuum of Care Program funded by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development according to the last three Point-in-Time surveys of homelessness conducted by that department.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), the department shall require each entity awarded a grant under this section to:

(1) leverage additional funding or in-kind contributions from private contributors or local governments, excluding state or federal funds, in an amount that is at least equal to the amount of the grant awarded under this section;

(2) provide evidence of significant coordination and collaboration between the entity, local mental health authorities, municipalities, local law enforcement agencies, and other community stakeholders in establishing or expanding a community collaborative funded by a grant awarded under this section; and

(3) provide evidence of a local law enforcement policy to divert appropriate persons from jails, other detention facilities, or mental health facilities operated by or under contract with the commission to an entity affiliated with a community collaborative for the purpose of providing services to those persons.

Text of subsection effective until April 01, 2025

(c) The department may award a grant under this chapter to an entity for the purpose of establishing a community mental health program in a county with a population of less than 250,000, if the entity leverages additional funding or in-kind contributions from private contributors or local governments, excluding state or federal funds, in an amount equal to one-quarter of the amount of the grant to be awarded under this section, and the entity otherwise meets the requirements of Subsections (b)(2) and (3).

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1143 (S.B. 58), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 950 (S.B. 1849), Sec. 2.03, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1252 (H.B. 4468), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 486 (H.B. 3088), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2021.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 3.01(3), eff. April 1, 2025.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 859 (H.B. 3466), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section effective until April 01, 2025

Sec. 539.003. ACCEPTABLE USES OF GRANT MONEY. An entity shall use money received from a grant made by the department and private funding sources for the establishment or expansion of a community collaborative. Acceptable uses for the money include:

(1) the development of the infrastructure of the collaborative and the start-up costs of the collaborative;

(2) the establishment, operation, or maintenance of other community service providers in the community served by the collaborative, including intake centers, detoxification units, sheltering centers for food, workforce training centers, microbusinesses, and educational centers;

(3) the provision of clothing, hygiene products, and medical services to and the arrangement of transitional and permanent residential housing for persons served by the collaborative;

(4) the provision of mental health services and substance abuse treatment not readily available in the community served by the collaborative;

(5) the provision of information, tools, and resource referrals to assist persons served by the collaborative in addressing the needs of their children; and

(6) the establishment and operation of coordinated intake processes, including triage procedures, to protect the public safety in the community served by the collaborative.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1143 (S.B. 58), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 486 (H.B. 3088), Sec. 5, eff. June 14, 2021.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 3.01(3), eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective until April 01, 2025

Sec. 539.004. ELEMENTS OF COMMUNITY COLLABORATIVES. (a) If appropriate, an entity may incorporate into the community collaborative operated by the entity the use of the Homeless Management Information System, transportation plans, and case managers. An entity may also consider incorporating into a collaborative mentoring and volunteering opportunities, strategies to assist homeless youth and homeless families with children, strategies to reintegrate persons who were recently incarcerated into the community, services for veterans, and strategies for persons served by the collaborative to participate in the planning, governance, and oversight of the collaborative.

(b) The focus of a community collaborative shall be the eventual successful transition of persons from receiving services from the collaborative to becoming integrated into the community served by the collaborative through community relationships and family supports.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1143 (S.B. 58), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 3.01(3), eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective until April 01, 2025

Sec. 539.005. OUTCOME MEASURES FOR COMMUNITY COLLABORATIVES. Each entity that receives a grant from the department to establish or expand a community collaborative shall select at least four of the following outcome measures that the entity will focus on meeting through the implementation and operation of the collaborative:

(1) persons served by the collaborative will find employment that results in those persons having incomes that are at or above 100 percent of the federal poverty level;

(2) persons served by the collaborative will find permanent housing;

(3) persons served by the collaborative will complete alcohol or substance abuse programs;

(4) the collaborative will help start social businesses in the community or engage in job creation, job training, or other workforce development activities;

(5) there will be a decrease in the use of jail beds by persons served by the collaborative;

(6) there will be a decrease in the need for emergency care by persons served by the collaborative;

(7) there will be a decrease in the number of children whose families lack adequate housing referred to the Department of Family and Protective Services or a local entity responsible for child welfare; and

(8) any other appropriate outcome measure that measures whether a collaborative is meeting a specific need of the community served by the collaborative and that is approved by the department.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1143 (S.B. 58), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 3.01(3), eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective until April 01, 2025

Sec. 539.0051. PLAN REQUIRED FOR CERTAIN COMMUNITY COLLABORATIVES. (a) The governing body of a county shall develop and make public a plan detailing:

(1) how local mental health authorities, municipalities, local law enforcement agencies, and other community stakeholders in the county could coordinate to establish or expand a community collaborative to accomplish the goals of Section 539.002;

(2) how entities in the county may leverage funding from private sources to accomplish the goals of Section 539.002 through the formation or expansion of a community collaborative; and

(3) how the formation or expansion of a community collaborative could establish or support resources or services to help local law enforcement agencies to divert persons who have been arrested to appropriate mental health care or substance abuse treatment.

(b) The governing body of a county in which an entity that received a grant under Section 539.002 before September 1, 2017, is located is not required to develop a plan under Subsection (a).

(c) Two or more counties, each with a population of less than 100,000, may form a joint plan under Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 950 (S.B. 1849), Sec. 2.04, eff. September 1, 2017.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 3.01(3), eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective until April 01, 2025

Sec. 539.006. ANNUAL REVIEW OF OUTCOME MEASURES. The department shall contract with an independent third party to verify annually whether a community collaborative is meeting the outcome measures under Section 539.005 selected by the entity that operates the collaborative.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1143 (S.B. 58), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 3.01(3), eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective until April 01, 2025

Sec. 539.007. REDUCTION AND CESSATION OF FUNDING. The department shall establish processes by which the department may reduce or cease providing funding to an entity if the community collaborative operated by the entity does not meet the outcome measures selected by the entity for the collaborative under Section 539.005. The department shall redistribute any funds withheld from an entity under this section to other entities operating high-performing collaboratives on a competitive basis.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1143 (S.B. 58), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 486 (H.B. 3088), Sec. 6, eff. June 14, 2021.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 3.01(3), eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective until April 01, 2025

Sec. 539.008. RULES. The executive commissioner shall adopt any rules necessary to implement the community collaborative grant program established under this chapter, including rules to establish the requirements for an entity to be eligible to receive a grant, the required elements of a community collaborative operated by an entity, and permissible and prohibited uses of money received by an entity from a grant made by the department under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1143 (S.B. 58), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 3.01(3), eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective until April 01, 2025

Sec. 539.009. ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS. A reasonable amount not to exceed five percent of the money appropriated by the legislature for the purposes of this subchapter may be used by the commission to pay administrative costs of implementing this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 486 (H.B. 3088), Sec. 7, eff. June 14, 2021.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 3.01(3), eff. April 1, 2025.

Without reference to the addition of this section, this chapter was repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 3.01(3), eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 539.010. BIENNIAL REPORT. (a) The department shall prepare a report that includes:

(1) the method by which the department chose entities to award grants to under this chapter;

(2) the amount of each grant awarded to an entity under this chapter;

(3) the number of individuals served by each community collaborative receiving grant funds under this chapter; and

(4) the results of the annual review of outcome measures required by Section 539.006.

(b) Not later than September 1 of each even-numbered year, the department shall submit a report described by Subsection (a) to:

(1) the lieutenant governor;

(2) the speaker of the house of representatives;

(3) the standing committees of the legislature having primary jurisdiction over the department and state finance; and

(4) the Legislative Budget Board.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 859 (H.B. 3466), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.